en: mild whole yogurt
de: Sahnejoghurt mild, Rahmjoghurt mild
fr: yaourt doux entier
hr: blagi punomasni jogurt
it: yogurt intero delicato

en: british yogurt
de: britischer Joghurt
fr: yaourt britannique
hr: britanski jogurt
it: yogurt britannico

en: greek yogurt
bg: цедено мляко
de: griechischer Joghurt
es: yogur griego, yogurt griego
fr: yaourt grec
hr: grčki jogurt
it: yogurt greco
nl: Griekse yoghurt
pl: jogurt grecki, jogurt typu greckiego
sk: Grécky jogurt

en: Plain Greek-style Yogurt
fr: Yaourt à la grecque nature
hr: obični grčki jogurt

en: skyr
xx: skyr

en: yogurt coating
hr: jogurt preljev
it: rivestimento allo yogurt

en: kefir, kephir
ar: فطر هندي
az: Kefir
be: Кефір
bg: Кефир
bs: Kefir
ca: Quefir de llet
cs: Kefír
da: Kefir
de: Kefir
el: Κεφίρ
eo: Kefiro
es: Kéfir, cultivo de kefir
et: Keefir
eu: Kefir
fa: کفیر
fi: Kefiiri
fr: kéfir, képhir
gl: Quefir
he: קפיר
hr: kefir
hu: Kefir
id: Kefir
it: Kefir
ja: ケフィア
kk: Кефир
ko: 케피르
ky: Кефир
lt: Kefyras
mk: Кефир
nl: Kefir
no: Kefir
pl: Kefir
pt: Kefir
ro: Chefir
ru: Кефир
sk: Kefír
sl: Kefir
sq: Kefiri
sr: Кефир
sv: Kefir
th: คีเฟอร์
tr: Kefir
uk: Кефір
wa: Kefir
zh: 克非尔

en: whole kefir
ca: Quèfir de llet sencer
de: Sahnekefir
es: kéfir entero
fr: Kéfir entier
hr: cijeli kefir
hu: teljes kefir
it: kefir intero

en: mild whole kefir
ca: Quèfir de la llet semidesnatat, quèfir de la llet parcialment desnatat
de: Sahnekefir mild, milder Sahnekefir
es: kéfir semidesnatado, kéfir parcialmente desnatado
fr: Kéfir doux entier
hr: blagi cjeloviti kefir
it: kefir intero delicato

en: mild kefir
ca: quèfir de la llet desnatat, quèfir de la llet descremat
de: Kefir mild, milder Kefir
es: kéfir desnatado, kéfir descremado
hr: blagi kefir
it: kefir delicato

en: whey, milk whey
an: Siero de leit
ar: مصل اللبن
be: Сыроватка
bg: Суроватка
bn: ঘোল
ca: Sèrum de llet, xerigot
cs: Syrovátka
cy: Maidd
da: valle
de: Molke, Molken, Käsemilch, Schotte, Sirte, Waddike, Wedicke, Zieger
el: Τυρόγαλα
eo: selakto, laktosero
es: Suero de leche, lactosuero, suero lácteo, suero de leche rico en calcio
et: Vadak
eu: Esne-gazur
fa: آب‌پنیر
fi: hera, maitohera
fr: petit-lait, lactosérum, sérum de lait, lactoserum, sérum naturel, sérum d'ensemencement, lactoserum naturel, sérum d'ensemencement naturel
fy: Waai
gl: Soro de leite, lactosoro
he: מי גבינה
hr: sirutka
hu: savó, tejsavó
id: Whey, laktoserum
io: selakto
is: Mysa
it: siero di latte, siero innesto naturale, siero innesto
ja: 乳清
ko: 유청
lb: Wässeg
lt: Išrūgos, išrūgų
lv: Sūkalas
ms: Whey
nb: Myse, valle
nl: Wei, Melkwei, melkserum
nn: Myse
oc: Lactoserum, leiton, gaspa, lachada
pa: ਪਨੀਰ ਦਾ ਪਾਣੀ
pl: Serwatka, serwatki, serwatkowe, serwatkowa, serwatkowy, serwatka (z mleka)
pt: soro de leite, lactossoro, lacto-soro, lactosoro
ro: Zer
ru: Молочная сыворотка
sh: Surutka
sk: Srvátka
sl: Sirotka
sr: Сурутка, surutka
sv: Vassle, vassla
te: పాల విరుగుడు
th: หางนม
tl: Lagnaw
tr: Peynir altı suyu
uk: Сироватка, Сиро́ватка моло́чна
zh: 乳清

en: acid whey
fr: Lactosérum acide
hr: kisela sirutka
it: siero di latte acido

en: whey powder, powdered whey, milk whey powder
bg: суроватка на прах, млечна суроватка на прах, млечна суха суроватка, суха млечна суроватка
ca: Xerigot en pols, sèrum en pols, sèrum làctic en pols
cs: sušená syrovátka
da: vallepulver, vallepulver af mælk
de: Molkenpulver, Molkepulver
es: suero de leche en polvo, lactoserum en polvo, suero en polvo
et: vadakupulber
fi: herajauhe, herajauhetta, herajauho
fr: lactosérum en poudre, petit-lait en poudre, sérum de lait en poudre, poudre de lactosérum
hr: sirutka u prahu
hu: tejsavópor, savópor, étkezési savópor
is: mysuduft
it: siero di latte in polvere, siero di latte polvere
ja: ホエイパウダー
lt: išrūgų milteliai, pieno išrūgų milteliai
lv: sūkalu pulveris
nb: mysepulver, mysepulver av melk
nl: weipoeder, wei poeder, wei-poeder
pl: serwatka w proszku, preparat serwatkowy, serwatka w proszku z mleka
pt: soro de leite em pó, lactossoro em pó, lacto-soro em pó, lactosoro em pó
ro: zer praf, produs din zer praf, derivat din zer pudră
ru: сухая молочная сыворотка, сыворотка молочная сухая, сыворотка сухая молочная
sk: sušená srvátka
sq: hirre pluhur
sv: vasslepulver, vasslepulver från mjölk
tr: peynir altı suyu tozu

en: partially demineralized powdered whey
ca: sèrum de la llet en pols parcialment desmineralitzat
de: Molkenpulver teilentmineralisiert
es: seuro de lleche en polvo parcialmente desmineralizado, lactosuero en polvo parcialmente desmineralizado
fr: lactosérum en poudre partiellement déminéralisé
hr: djelomično demineralizirana sirutka u prahu
it: siero di latte in polvere parzialmente demineralizzato

en: sweet whey
ca: sèrum de la llet ensucrat
cs: sladká SYROVÁTKA
de: Süßmolke, Süssmolke, Süßmolken
es: suero de leche azucarado, lactosuero azucarado
fi: makea hera, makeutettu hera
fr: lactosérum doux
hr: slatka sirutka
it: Siero di latte dolce
lv: saldas sūkalas
nl: zoete wei
pl: słodka serwatka

en: skimmed sweet whey
hr: slatka obrana sirutka
it: siero di latte dolce scremato

en: filtered whey powder
ca: sèrum de la llet en pols filtrat
de: gefiltertes Molkepulver
es: suero de leche en polvo filtrado, lactosuero en polvo filtrado
fi: suodatettu herajauhe
fr: petit-lait filtré en poudre, lactosérum filtré en poudre
hr: filtrirana sirutka u prahu
it: filtrato di siero di latte in polvere
nl: weifiltraatpoeder

en: Demineralised whey, demineralized whey, demineralized whey powder
ca: sèrum de la llet desmineralitzat
de: entsalzte Molke
es: suero de la leche desmineralizado, lactosuero desmineralizado
fr: lactosérum déminéralisé
hr: demineralizirana sirutka
it: siero di latte demineralizzato
nl: Gedemineraliseerde wei

en: concentrated whey
ca: sèrum de la llet concentrat
da: vallekoncentrat
de: konzentrierte Molke
es: lactosuero concentrado, suero de la leche concentrado
fi: heratiiviste, herakonsentraatti
fr: lactosérum concentré
hr: koncentrirana sirutka
hu: sűrített tejsavó
it: siero di latte concentrato
nl: Geconcentreerde wei
pl: koncentrat serwatki, serwatka skondensowana, skondensowana serwatka, serwatka zagęszczona
pt: soro de leite concentrado, lactossoro concentrado, lacto-soro concentrado, lactosoro concentrado
sv: vasslekoncentrat

en: whey product, whey based formula
ca: producte del sèrum de la llet
cs: Syrovátkový produkt
da: valleprodukt
de: Molkenerzeugnis, formel auf molkebasis
es: Producto de suero
fi: heratuote, herapohjainen korvike
fr: produit de lactosérum, produit de petit-lait, produit à base de lactosérum, préparation à base de lactosérum, dérivé de lactosérum
hr: mliječni derivat
hu: tejsavó alapú termék
it: derivati del siero di latte, preparazione del siero di latte
nl: weiproduct, wei-product
pl: produkt serwatkowy
pt: produto de soro de leite
ro: produs din zer
sk: srvatkový výrobok
sv: vassleprodukt